New York, session 2025-2026, S1619.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 6801 of the education law, as 2 added by section 2 of part C of chapter 57 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 7. A licensed pharmacist is a qualified health care professional under 5 section five hundred seventy-one of the public health law for the 6 purposes of directing a limited service laboratory and ordering and 7 administering COVID-19 [and], influenza, respiratory syncytial virus 8 (RSV), pharyngitis resulting from a Group A streptococcal infection, 9 HbA1c, hepatitis C, and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) tests author- 10 ized by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA), subject to certificate 11 of waiver requirements established pursuant to the federal clinical 12 laboratory improvement act of nineteen hundred eighty-eight. 13 § 2. Section 8 of part C of chapter 57 of the laws of 2022 amending 14 the public health law and the education law relating to allowing pharma- 15 cists to direct limited service laboratories and order and administer 16 COVID-19 and influenza tests and modernizing nurse practitioners, as 17 amended by section 1 of part P of chapter 57 of the laws of 2024, is 18 amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04152-01-5 S. 1619 2 1 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 2 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2022; provided, 3 however, that sections one, two, three, four, six and seven of this act 4 shall expire and be deemed repealed July 1, [2026] 2028. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 6 the amendments to subdivision 7 of section 6801 of the education law 7 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 8 subdivision and shall be deemed repealed therewith.